Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-946
University of Nebraska-Lincoln; doctoral and postdoctoral programs; primary responsibility; exception.

The University of Nebraska-Lincoln shall continue to be the primary unit within the University of Nebraska for doctoral and postdoctoral programs except in health-related disciplines. There shall be no duplication of administrative responsibility for any doctoral or postdoctoral program among units of the university.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 30.